Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-16] Custodian compliance and
immunity. (a) Not later than sixty days after receipt of the information
required under sections 556A-7 through 556A-15, a custodian shall comply with a
request under this chapter from a fiduciary or designated recipient to disclose
digital assets or terminate an account. If the custodian fails to comply, the
fiduciary or designated recipient may apply to the court for an order directing
compliance.

(b) An order under subsection (a) directing
compliance shall contain a finding that compliance is not in violation of title
18 U.S.C. section 2702.

(c) A custodian may notify the user that a
request for disclosure or to terminate an account was made under this chapter.

(d) A custodian may deny a request under this
chapter from a fiduciary or designated recipient for disclosure of digital
assets or to terminate an account if the custodian is aware of any lawful
access to the account following the receipt of the fiduciary's request.

(e) This chapter does not limit a custodian's
ability to obtain or require a fiduciary or designated recipient requesting
disclosure or termination under this chapter to obtain a court order that:

(1) Specifies that an account belongs to the
protected person or principal;

(2) Specifies that there is sufficient consent from
the protected person or principal to support the requested disclosure; and

(3) Contains a finding required by law other than
this chapter.

(f) A custodian and its officers, employees,
and agents are immune from liability for an act or omission done in good faith
in compliance with this chapter. [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next